Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB294.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5557.1. Whistleblower protection. An employee of a business, nonprofit entity or government entity subject to this subchapter shall be deemed to be an employee under the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this subchapter. A business, nonprofit entity or government entity subject to this subchapter shall be deemed to be an employer under the Whistleblower Law with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of 1234567891011121314151617 thi s subchapter. Section 2. Section 5561(b)(6) introductory paragraph of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 5561. Nonapplicability of subchapter.* * *(b) Exemptions.--The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to the following:* * *(6) Conduct performed on animals actively involved in a bona fide scientific or medical research that is lawful under the laws of the United States or this Commonwealth relating to activities undertaken by a research facility that is one of the following:* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0294PN0238 - 2 - 123456789101112131415